Utah statutes.
63K-4-402.   Acquisition of property for public use -- Compensation of
owners.
(1) (a)  Upon proclamation of a state of emergency, the governor may purchase
or lease public or private property for public use including:
(i)  food and medical supplies;
(ii)  clothing;
(iii)  shelter;
(iv)  means of transportation;
(v)  fuels;
(vi)  oils; or
(vii)  buildings or lands.
(b)  The governor may not purchase private home storage nor privately owned
arms.
(2) (a)  The governor may use property purchased under authority of this
section for any purpose to meet the needs of an emergency, including its use
to relieve want, distress, and disease.
(b)  Any property used by the governor to meet the needs of an emergency is a
public use.
(3) (a)  The governor shall compensate the owner of property taken or used
under authority of this section by complying with the procedures established
in Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain.
(b)  The governor shall pay for those purchases or leases from the funds
available to the Division of Homeland Security under:
(i)  this chapter; or
(ii)  Title 53, Chapter 2, Part 4, Disaster Recovery Funding Act, to the
extent provided for in that chapter.
(4)  Nothing in this section applies to or authorizes compensation for the
destruction or damage of standing timber or other property in order to provide
a fire break or to the release of waters or the breach of impoundments in
order to reduce pressure or other danger from actual or threatened flood.
